Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202524-808
Judicial nominating commissions; vacancies; how filled.

(1) A vacancy relating to any member or alternate citizen member of a judicial nominating commission appointed by the Governor shall be filled promptly by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term.

(2) A vacancy of a lawyer member caused by resignation shall be filled promptly with the alternate lawyer member of the same political party for the unexpired term. If an alternate lawyer member of the same political party does not exist, then an alternate lawyer member not affiliated with any political party may fill the vacancy. If there are no alternates who meet such requirements, the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall use the certified election results of the previous election and move up the alternate member who had the highest number of votes in the previous election who would not otherwise conflict with the requirements of Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska, to balance political party membership.

(3) A vacancy of an alternate lawyer member for an unexpired term shall be filled promptly by the Executive Council of the Nebraska State Bar Association upon notification by the Clerk of the Supreme Court as to the required number of vacancies and the required political party affiliation or nonpartisan designation. The Executive Council shall designate sufficient lawyers to fill the vacancies who meet the requirements of subsection (1) of section 24-806.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 8, p. 475;

Laws 1995, LB 303, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB388, § 5.